District of Columbia statutes.
48-903.06

Records and inventories of registrants.

Persons registered to manufacture, distribute, or dispense controlled substances under this chapter shall keep records and maintain inventories in conformance with the record-keeping and inventory requirements of federal law, laws of the District of Columbia, and with any additional rules which the Mayor issues.

Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, title III, § 306, 28 DCR 3081

History

This section is referenced in § 48-903.08.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 33-536.

Prior Codifications